Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2181.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13.8(h) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is amended to read:Section 13.8. Drug Overdose Medication.--* * *(h) As used in this section, the term "opioid antagonist" means a drug or device approved by the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (52 Stat. 1040, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.) for emergency reversal of known or suspected opioid overdose, including naloxone hydrochloride, nalmefene hydrochloride or 12345678910111213141516171819202122 other similarly acting drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of an opioid overdose.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2181PN2835 - 2 - 123